Nebraska, session 109, LB604.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB604 LB604
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 32-1405, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
32-1405 (1) Prior to obtaining any signatures on an initiative or
referendum petition, a statement of the object of the petition and the
text of the measure shall be filed with the Secretary of State together
with a sworn statement containing the names and street addresses of every
person, corporation, or association sponsoring the petition. Sponsors of
the petition may be added or removed with the unanimous written consent
of the original sponsor or sponsors at any time prior to or on the day
the petition is filed for verification with the Secretary of State.
(2) Upon receipt of the filing, the Secretary of State shall
transmit the text of the proposed measure to the Revisor of Statutes. The
Revisor of Statutes shall review the proposed measure and suggest changes
as to form and draftsmanship. The revisor shall complete the review
within ten business days after receipt from the Secretary of State. The
Secretary of State shall provide the results of the review and suggested
changes to the sponsor but shall otherwise keep the proposed measure, the
review, and the sworn statement confidential for five days after receipt
of the review by the sponsor. The Secretary of State shall then maintain
the proposed measure, the opinion, and the sworn statement as public
information and as a part of the official record of the initiative. The
sponsor may make any changes recommended by the Revisor of Statutes and
shall submit final language to the Secretary of State. If the final
language is addressing a subject that is substantially different in form
or substance from the initial filing or the changes recommended by the
Revisor of Statutes, the Secretary of State shall reject it.
(3) The Secretary of State shall prepare the form of the petition
from the final language filed by the sponsor and shall provide a copy of
the form of the petition to the sponsor within five business days after
receipt of the final language of the proposed measure. The sponsor shall
print the petitions to be circulated from the forms provided. Prior to
-2-

LB604 LB604
2025 2025
circulation, the sponsor shall file a sample copy of the petition to be
circulated with the Secretary of State.
(4) Upon receipt of the sample copy of the petition, the Secretary
of State shall post on the Secretary of State's website the text of the
measure and notice that the measure is in circulation. The text and
notice shall remain posted until the deadline for filing petitions.
Sec. 2. Section 32-1412, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
32-1412 (1) If the Secretary of State refuses to place on the ballot
any measure proposed by an initiative petition presented or which may be
presented at least four months preceding the date of the election at
which the proposed law or constitutional amendment is to be voted upon or
a referendum petition presented or which may be presented within ninety
days after the Legislature enacting the law to which the petition applies
adjourns sine die or for a period longer than ninety days, any resident
may apply, within ten days after the announcement of such refusal, to the
district court of Lancaster County for a writ of mandamus. If the
Secretary of State's refusal to place the measure on the ballot is based
on any legal insufficiency other than an insufficiency of signatures
pursuant to Article III, section 2, of the Constitution of Nebraska, the
Secretary of State shall announce his or her refusal on the same date as
posting the notice of circulation pursuant to subsection (4) of section
32-1405 and shall state the reason for his or her refusal in the
announcement. The Secretary of State's failure to state the reason for
his or her refusal in the announcement shall be considered a waiver of
those defenses. If it is decided by the court that such petition is
legally sufficient, the Secretary of State shall order the issue placed
upon the ballot at the next general election.
(2)(a) (2) On a showing that an initiative or referendum petition is
not legally sufficient, the court, on the application of any resident,
may (i) enjoin the Secretary of State and all other officers from
-3-

LB604 LB604
2025 2025
certifying or printing on the official ballot for the next general
election the ballot title and number of such measure or (ii) declare the
measure legally removed from the ballot if preventing the certification
or printing of the measure on the ballot is no longer practicable. If a
suit is filed against the Secretary of State seeking to enjoin him or her
from placing the measure on the official ballot or to have the court
declare the measure legally removed, the person who is the sponsor of
record of the petition shall be a necessary party defendant in such suit.
(b) Any suit brought pursuant to this subsection asserting the
insufficiency of an initiative or referendum petition, other than for
insufficiency of signatures pursuant to Article III, section 2, of the
Constitution of Nebraska, shall be commenced within sixty days after the
Secretary of State posts the notice of circulation pursuant to subsection
(4) of section 32-1405 unless the sixtieth day falls after the deadline
for filing petitions. If the sixtieth day falls after the deadline for
filing petitions, then the suit shall be commenced by the close of
business on the last day for filing petitions.
(3) Such suits shall be advanced on the trial docket and heard and
decided by the court as quickly as possible. Either party may appeal to
the Court of Appeals within ten days after a decision is rendered. The
appeal procedures described in the Administrative Procedure Act shall not
apply to this section.
(4) The district court of Lancaster County shall have jurisdiction
over all litigation arising under sections 32-1401 to 32-1416. However,
if a suit brought pursuant to this section does not assert an
insufficiency of signatures, then the Supreme Court shall hear the case
pursuant to its original jurisdiction under section 24-204 if practicable
and upon petition of any party.
(5) Any official asserting a defense to an action brought pursuant
to subsection (1) of this section, or any resident asserting the legal
insufficiency of an initiative or referendum petition pursuant to
-4-

LB604 LB604
2025 2025
subsection (2) of this section, may raise the substantive facial
insufficiency of the measure in question. Such an insufficiency may be
the sole basis for the claim or defense. No claim shall be dismissed, nor
any official prevented from raising a defense, for lack of ripeness of a
claimed substantive facial insufficiency.
(6) Nothing in this section shall be construed as applying to or
limiting suits not brought pursuant to this section and brought after
enactment of a measure.
Sec. 3. Original sections 32-1405 and 32-1412, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-5-